Utah statutes.
32B-2-504.   Delivery of liquor to state store.

(1)  Liquor to be sold from a state store may be transported from a warehouse authorized by the department to the state store if transported by a person authorized by the department to transport the liquor to the state store, including a common carrier.

(2)  A person, while in or about a vehicle in which liquor is being transported, may not open, break, or allow to be opened or broken, a container containing liquor.

(3)  A person may not drink, use, or allow to be drunk or used, liquor while it is in transit under this section.

